Utah statutes.
61-2-6.   Licensing procedures and requirements.
(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (5), the commission shall determine
the qualifications and requirements of an applicant for:
(i)  a principal broker license;
(ii)  an associate broker license; or
(iii)  a sales agent license.
(b)  The division, with the concurrence of the commission, shall require and
pass upon proof necessary to determine the honesty, integrity, truthfulness,
reputation, and competency of each applicant for an initial license or for
renewal of an existing license.
(c) (i)  The division, with the concurrence of the commission, shall require
an applicant for:
(A)  a sales agent license to complete an approved educational program
consisting of the number of hours designated by rule made by the commission
with the concurrence of the division, except that the rule may not require
less than 120 hours; and
(B)  an associate broker or principal broker license to complete an approved
educational program consisting of the number of hours designated by rule made
by the commission with the concurrence of the division, except that the rule
may not require less than 120 hours.
(ii)  An hour required by this section means 50 minutes of instruction in each
60 minutes.
(iii)  The maximum number of program hours available to an individual is ten
hours per day.
(d)  The division, with the concurrence of the commission, shall require the
applicant to pass an examination approved by the commission covering:
(i)  the fundamentals of:
(A)  the English language;
(B)  arithmetic;
(C)  bookkeeping; and
(D)  real estate principles and practices;
(ii)  the provisions of this chapter;
(iii)  the rules established by the commission; and
(iv)  any other aspect of Utah real estate license law considered appropriate.
(e) (i)  Three years' full-time experience as a real estate sales agent or its
equivalent is required before an applicant may apply for, and secure a
principal broker or associate broker license in this state.
(ii)  The commission shall establish by rule, made in accordance with Title
63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the criteria by which the
commission will accept experience or special education in similar fields of
business in lieu of the three years' experience.
(2) (a)  The division, with the concurrence of the commission, may require an
applicant to furnish a sworn statement setting forth evidence satisfactory to
the division of the applicant's reputation and competency as set forth by
rule.
(b)  The division shall require an applicant to provide the applicant's Social
Security number, which is a private record under Subsection 63G-2-302(1)(h).
(3) (a)  A nonresident principal broker may be licensed in this state by
complying with all the provisions of this chapter except that of residency.
(b)  A nonresident associate broker or sales agent may become licensed in this
state by:
(i)  complying with all the provisions of this chapter except that of
residency; and
(ii)  being employed or engaged as an independent contractor by or on behalf
of a nonresident or resident principal broker who is licensed in this state.
(4) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection 61-2-9(1)(e)(iv), the division and
commission shall treat an application to be relicensed of an applicant whose
real estate license is revoked as an original application.
(b)  In the case of an applicant for a new license as a principal broker or
associate broker, the applicant is not entitled to credit for experience
gained before the revocation of a real estate license.
(5) (a)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), the commission may delegate to the
division the authority to:
(i)  review a class or category of applications for initial or renewed
licenses;
(ii)  determine whether an applicant meets the licensing criteria in
Subsection (1); and
(iii)  approve or deny a license application without concurrence by the
commission.
(b) (i)  If the commission delegates to the division the authority to approve
or deny an application without concurrence by the commission and the division
denies an application for licensure, the applicant who is denied licensure may
petition the commission for review of the denial of licensure.
(ii)  An applicant who is denied licensure pursuant to this Subsection (5) may
seek agency review by the executive director only after the commission has
reviewed the division's denial of the applicant's application.
